src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-bero_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Dummy test replace with real content - noun:
    bero+N+Sg+Nom: bero
    bero+N+Sg+Gen: beroa
    bero+N+Pl+Nom: beropdo
    bero+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: oberoa
    bero+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: eberoa
    bero+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: aberoa
